Hawaii statutes.
§421-9 Powers. (a) An association
formed under this chapter, or an association which might be formed under this
chapter and which existed at the time this chapter took effect, shall have the
capacity to act possessed by natural persons, but the association shall have
the authority to perform only such acts as are necessary or proper to
accomplish the purposes as set forth in its articles and which are not
repugnant to law.

(b) Without limiting or enlarging the grant of
authority contained in subsection (a), every association shall have authority:

(1) To act as agent, broker, or attorney in fact for
its members, and for any subsidiary or affiliated association, and otherwise to
assist or join with associations engaged in any one or more of the activities
authorized by its articles, and to hold title for its members and for
subsidiary and affiliated associations to property handled or managed by the
association on their behalf.

(2) To make contracts, and to exercise by its board
or duly authorized officers or agents, all such incidental powers as may be
necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of the purposes of the
association and not inconsistent with law or its articles, and that may be
conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association.

(3) To make loans or advances to members or
producer-patrons or to the members of an association which is itself a member
or subsidiary thereof; to purchase or otherwise acquire, endorse, discount, or
sell any evidence of debt, obligation, or security, but it shall not engage in
banking.

(4) To establish and accumulate reserves to capital.

(5) To own and hold membership in or shares of the
capital stock of other associations and corporations and the bonds or other
obligations thereof, engaged in any related activity; or, in producing,
warehousing, or marketing any of the products handled by the association; or,
in financing its activities, and while the owner thereof, to exercise all the
rights of ownership, including the right to vote thereon.

(6) To acquire, hold, sell, dispose of, pledge, or
mortgage, any property which its purposes may require, subject to any
limitation prescribed by law or its articles.

(7) To borrow money and to give its notes, bonds, or
other obligations therefor and secure the payment thereof by mortgage or
pledge.

(8) To deal in agricultural products and handle
agricultural machinery, equipment, and supplies, and perform services for
nonmembers to an amount not greater in annual value than such as are dealt in,
handled, or performed for or on behalf of its members.

(9) To have a corporate seal and to alter it at
pleasure.

(10) To continue as a corporation for the time limit
in its articles, which may be perpetual.

(11) To sue and be sued in its corporate name.

(12) To conduct business in this State and elsewhere
as may be permitted by law.

(13) To dissolve and wind up its affairs.

(14) To charge differential rates on the sale of its
goods and services to members and nonmembers as provided for in its bylaws. [L
1949, c 234, pt of §1; RL 1955, §176-10; HRS §421-9; am L 1972, c 103, §4; am L
1982, c 257, §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next